District of Columbia statutes.
31-858

Applicability.

The privilege shall apply to all litigation or administrative proceedings pending on April 11, 2003, or filed subsequent to April 11, 2003.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-293, § 9, 50 DCR 296